Hawaii statutes.
§514E-19 Protection of purchasers from
blanket liens. (a) An escrow for the sale of a time share interest in a
time share ownership plan may close only if the requirements of any one of the
following alternatives for protecting the purchaser have been satisfied:

(1) The time share interest is conveyed to the
purchaser free and clear of any blanket liens.

(2) The time share unit is conveyed to a trustee:

(A) Free and clear of any blanket liens under
a trust meeting the requirements of sections 514E-22 and 23; or

(B) Under a lien payment trust meeting the
requirements of sections 514E-22, 23, 24, and 25.

(3) (A) The time share interest is conveyed to
the purchaser subject only to blanket liens:

(i) Where every person holding an interest in
the blanket lien has executed and recorded a nondisturbance agreement; or

(ii) For which the director's acceptance of a
surety bond or an irrevocable letter of credit meeting the requirements of
section 514E-28 has been recorded with respect to that time share unit; and

(B) If legal or equitable title will be held
by anyone other than the purchaser, a notice of time share plan is recorded.

(4) The requirements of any alternative arrangements
accepted by the director have been met.

(b) An escrow for the sale of a time share
interest in a time share use plan may close only if the requirements of any one
of the following alternatives for protecting purchasers have been satisfied:

(1) The time share unit is conveyed to a trustee:

(A) Free and clear of any blanket liens under
a trust meeting the requirements of sections 514E-22 and 23; or

(B) Under a lien payment trust meeting the
requirements of sections 514E-22, 23, 24, and 25.

(2) A notice of time share plan is recorded and
either:

(A) Every person holding an interest in a
recorded blanket lien against any time share interests in that time share unit
executes and records a nondisturbance agreement; or

(B) The director's acceptance of a surety
bond or an irrevocable letter of credit meeting the requirements of section
514E-28 is recorded.

(3) The requirements of any alternative arrangements
accepted by the director have been met.

(c) A time share interest in any time share
plan which satisfies the escrow and blanket lien protection requirements of
this chapter shall not be deemed a risk capital security under chapter 485A,
and the offer or sale of a time share interest therein shall not be deemed the
offer or sale of a security. [L 1982, c 186, §7; am L 2006, c 229, §15]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next